Hawaii statutes.
§437-25 Amended licenses. (a) Prior
to entering the employ of a dealer, other than the one for which the
salesperson's license was issued, a salesperson shall apply to the board for an
amended license authorizing the new employment. Prior to moving or amending
the premises or adding branch locations of a business for which a license was
issued under this chapter, the holder shall apply for an amended license
authorizing the change.

(b) The executive officer of the board is
authorized to issue the amended license of a salesperson subject to the
ratification by the board for the first three amendments to a license during
the original term thereof. The board shall issue the fourth and following
amendments to such license during the term of the original license. The
executive officer may issue an amended license for new or amended premises or
for additional branch locations of the business under a license subject to the
board's ratification; provided that the executive officer may not issue an
amended license when a prior amendment to the same license has not been acted
upon by the board. Unless good cause exists, the amended license shall be
freely issued for the remainder of the original term.

(c) The fees for amended licenses shall be as
provided in rules adopted by the director of commerce and consumer affairs
pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1963, c 199, §1(1); Supp, §160-171.3; HRS §437-25;
am L 1969, c 263, §1(14); am L 1984, c 7, §5; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 1996, c
264, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next